Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-2307
Board of examiners; examinations; conduct; test qualifications of applicants for Class B licenses.

The board of examiners shall, twice each year, conduct examinations of applicants for Class B licenses under section 39-2308. Such examinations shall be designed to test the qualifications of applicants for the position of county highway superintendent or city street superintendent and shall cover the ability to assist in:

(1) Developing and annually updating long-range plans or programs based on needs and coordinated with adjacent local governmental units;

(2) Developing annual programs for design, construction, and maintenance;

(3) Developing annual budgets based on programmed projects and activities; and

(4) Implementing the capital improvements and maintenance activities provided in the approved plans, programs, and budgets.

Laws 1969, c. 144, § 7, p. 667;

Laws 2003, LB 500, § 7;

Laws 2021, LB174, § 8.